District of Columbia statutes.
32-204

Employment of minors under 16 years of age in certain occupations prohibited; exception.

(a)

No minor under 16 years of age shall be employed, permitted, or suffered to work at any of the following occupations:

(1)

In the operation of any machinery operated by power other than hand or foot power; or

(2)

In oiling, wiping, or cleaning machinery or assisting therein.

(b)

This section does not apply to any duly approved vocational education program or training under the auspices of the Board of Education or the Trustees of the University.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 999, ch. 908, § 4
June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(4), 23 DCR 514
This section is referenced in § 32-203.
1981 Ed., § 36-504.
1973 Ed., § 36-204.